Massachusetts, session 194th, H417.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 15A of chapter 138 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2010
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 49 after the word “exercised” the
following words: and to all section 15 licensees in that city or town.
of 1